District of Columbia statutes.
7-1007

Penalties.

(a)

Any person or the agent of any person in the District of Columbia who denies or interferes with admittance to or enjoyment of any of the places, accommodations, or conveyances listed in §§ 7-1001 and 7-1002 or otherwise interferes with the rights of a blind person or person with another physical disability under § 7-1001, § 7-1002, § 7-1005, or § 7-1006 shall be imprisoned for not longer than 90 days, or fined not more than $300, or both.

(b)

A civil fine of $250 may be imposed as an alternative sanction for any infraction of the provisions of this chapter pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.]. Adjudication of any infraction of this chapter shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801.01 et seq.].

(c)

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to increase the fine in subsection (b) of this section.

History

Oct. 21, 1972, 86 Stat. 972, Pub. L. 92-515, § 6
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 25(e), 53 DCR 6198
May 22, 2010, D.C. Law 18-146, § 2(b), 57 DCR 2549

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-1831.03.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-1707.
1973 Ed., § 6-1506.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-305 substituted “person or person with another physical disability” for “or otherwise disabled person”.
D.C. Law 18-146 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); and added subsecs. (b) and (c).